Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB4.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 510 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of grooming a minor when:
(a) Being eighteen (18) years of age or older, he or she engages in grooming behavior directed at a
minor who is under fourteen (14) years old with the intent to entice, coerce, solicit, or induce the
minor to engage in sexual conduct with the person or another person; or
(b) Being a person in a position of authority or position of special trust, as those terms are defined in
KRS 532.045, he or she engages in grooming behavior directed at a minor who is under eighteen (18)
years old with the intent to:
1. Entice, coerce, solicit, or induce the minor to engage in sexual conduct with the person or
another person; or
2. Develop an intimate or secretive relationship with the minor.
(2) (a) For a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, grooming a minor is a Class A misdemeanor
unless the minor is under twelve (12) years old, in which case it is a Class D felony.
(b) For a violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section, grooming a minor is a Class D felony unless the
minor is under twelve (12) years old, in which case it is a Class C felony.
(c) Any sentence imposed on a defendant under this section shall run concurrently with any sentence
imposed for an offense specified in this chapter arising from the same course of conduct with the
same victim.
(3) This section shall not be construed to prevent a person from communicating with a minor for any lawful or
legitimate purpose, including but not limited to:
(a) Teaching curriculum on human sexuality or sexually transmitted diseases as provided in KRS
158.1415;
(b) The use of a traceable communication system by a school district employee or volunteer as provided
in KRS 160.145;
(c) The diagnosis or treatment of a minor by a health care provider in a health care facility;
(d) Communicating with a minor to determine if the minor is dependent, neglected, or abused;
(e) Age-appropriate conversations about puberty and human sexuality with a minor by the minor's
sibling or parent or guardian; and
(f) Any conversation with a minor that is part of a person's job-related or volunteer-related duties.
Section 2. KRS 510.010 is amended to read as follows:
The following definitions apply in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Adult intermediary" means a person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older and communicates with
another for the purpose of procuring or promoting the use of a minor in violation of KRS 510.155;
(2) "Course of conduct" means a pattern of conduct composed of two (2) or more acts, evidencing a continuity
of purpose;
(3) "Deviate sexual intercourse" means any act of sexual gratification involving the sex organs of one person and
the mouth or anus of another; or penetration of the anus of one person by any body part or a foreign object
manipulated by another person. "Deviate sexual intercourse" does not include penetration of the anus by any
body part or a foreign object in the course of the performance of generally recognized health-care practices;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(4)[(2)] "Forcible compulsion" means physical force or threat of physical force, express or implied, which
places a person in fear of immediate death, physical injury to self or another person, fear of the immediate
kidnap of self or another person, or fear of any offense under this chapter. Physical resistance on the part of the
victim shall not be necessary to meet this definition;
(5) "Foreign object" means anything used in commission of a sexual act other than the person of the actor;
(6) "Grooming behavior" means a course of conduct directed at a minor that is intended to establish an
emotional connection with a minor through manipulation, trust-building, or influence to:
(a) Facilitate future acts of sexual conduct; or
(b) Normalize or desensitize the minor to acts of sexual conduct;
even if no in-person meeting or act of sexual conduct is completed. This conduct may occur online or in
person, through third parties, or by other indirect methods to facilitate the manipulation of a minor;
(7) "Individual with an intellectual disability" means a person with significantly subaverage general
intellectual functioning existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior and manifested during the
developmental period;
(8)[(3)] "Mental illness" means a diagnostic term that covers many clinical categories, typically including
behavioral or psychological symptoms, or both, along with impairment of personal and social function, and
specifically defined and clinically interpreted through reference to criteria contained in the Diagnostic and
Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (Third Edition) and any subsequent revision thereto, of the American
Psychiatric Association;[
(4) "Individual with an intellectual disability" means a person with significantly subaverage general intellectual
functioning existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior and manifested during the developmental
period, as defined in KRS Chapter 202B;]
(9)[(5)] "Mentally incapacitated" means that a person is rendered temporarily incapable of appraising or
controlling his or her conduct as a result of the influence of an intoxicating substance administered to him or
her without his or her consent or as a result of any other act committed upon him or her without his or her
consent;
(10)[(6)] "Physically helpless" means that a person is unconscious or for any other reason is physically unable to
communicate unwillingness to an act. "Physically helpless" also includes a person who has been rendered
unconscious or for any other reason is physically unable to communicate an unwillingness to an act as a result
of the influence of a controlled substance or legend drug;
(11) "Registrant" has the same meaning as in KRS 17.500;
(12) "Sexual conduct" has the same meaning as in KRS 531.010;
(13)[(7)] "Sexual contact" means the touching of a person's intimate parts or the touching of the clothing or other
material intended to cover the immediate area of a person's intimate parts, if that touching can be construed by
a reasonable person as being done:
(a) For the purpose of sexual arousal or gratification of either party;
(b) For a sexual purpose; or
(c) In a sexual manner for the purpose of:
1. Exacting revenge or retribution;
2. Humiliating or degrading; or
3. Punishment; and
(14)[(8)] "Sexual intercourse" means sexual intercourse in its ordinary sense and includes penetration of the sex
organs of one person by any body part or a foreign object manipulated by another person. Sexual intercourse
occurs upon any penetration, however slight; emission is not required. "Sexual intercourse" does not include
penetration of the sex organ by any body part or a foreign object in the course of the performance of generally
recognized health-care practices[;
(9) "Foreign object" means anything used in commission of a sexual act other than the person of the actor;
(10) "Registrant" has the same meaning as in KRS 17.500; and

CHAPTER 65 3
(11) "Adult intermediary" means a person who is age eighteen (18) years or older, who communicates with another
for the purpose of procuring or promoting the use of a minor in violation of KRS 510.155].
Section 3. KRS 161.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as described in KRS 161.795, the Education Professional Standards Board may revoke, suspend, or
refuse to issue or renew; impose probationary or supervisory conditions upon; issue a written reprimand or
admonishment; or any combination of those actions regarding any certificate issued under KRS 161.010 to
161.100, or any certificate or license issued under any previous law to superintendents, principals, teachers,
substitute teachers, interns, supervisors, directors of pupil personnel, or other administrative, supervisory, or
instructional employees for the following reasons:
(a) Being convicted of, or entering an ["]Alford["] plea or plea of nolo contendere to, notwithstanding an
order granting probation or suspending imposition of any sentence imposed following the conviction or
entry of the plea, one (1) of the following:
1. A felony;
2. A misdemeanor under KRS Chapter 218A, 508, 509, 510, 522, 525, 529, 530, or 531; or
3. A misdemeanor involving a student or minor.
A certified copy of the conviction or plea shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction or plea;
(b) Having sexual contact as defined in KRS 510.010[(7)] with a student or minor. Conviction in a criminal
proceeding shall not be a requirement for disciplinary action;
(c) Committing any act that constitutes fraudulent, corrupt, dishonest, or immoral conduct. If the act
constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding shall not be a condition precedent to
disciplinary action;
(d) Demonstrating willful or careless disregard for the health, welfare, or safety of others;
(e) Physical or mental incapacity that prevents the certificate holder from performing duties with
reasonable skill, competence, or safety;
(f) Possessing, using, or being under the influence of alcohol, which impairs the performance of duties;
(g) Unlawfully possessing or unlawfully using a drug during the performance of duties;
(h) Incompetency or neglect of duty;
(i) Making, or causing to be made, any false or misleading statement or concealing a material fact in
obtaining issuance or renewal of any certificate;
(j) Failing to report as required by subsection (3) of this section;
(k) Failing to comply with an order of the Education Professional Standards Board;
(l) Violating any state statute relating to schools or the teaching profession;
(m) Violating the professional code of ethics for Kentucky school certified personnel established by the
Education Professional Standards Board through the promulgation of administrative regulation;
(n) Violating any administrative regulation promulgated by the Education Professional Standards Board or
the Kentucky Board of Education; or
(o) Receiving disciplinary action or having the issuance of a certificate denied or restricted by another
jurisdiction on grounds that constitute a violation of this subsection.
(2) The Education Professional Standards Board shall respond to complaints against a certificate holder by the
following process:
(a) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, within thirty (30) calendar days of the
receipt of a completed complaint, board staff shall conduct an initial review to determine whether
there is sufficient evidence that a violation may have occurred and shall provide notice of the
initial determination to the certificate holder within seven (7) business days that shall include the
complete copy of the report and all underlying relevant documents and records. If the complaint
alleges unauthorized electronic communication as defined in KRS 160.145, sexual contact, or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
other sexual misconduct, the identity of a complainant that is not the superintendent and any
identifying information of the minor involved in the complaint shall remain confidential.
2. When a complaint alleges unauthorized electronic communication, as defined in KRS 160.145,
sexual contact, or other sexual misconduct, the board staff shall have one hundred twenty (120)
days to conduct the initial review required by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph;
(b) Upon receipt of the notice, the certificate holder shall have thirty (30) calendar days to respond or
provide a rebuttal to any complaint that was determined to contain sufficient evidence that a violation
may have occurred. The response period shall be extended an additional thirty (30) calendar days upon
the certificate holder's written request submitted to the board;
(c) Within ten (10) business days of the receipt of the certificate holder's response or the end of the
response period established in paragraph (b) of this subsection, board staff shall conduct another review
of the complaint to determine if sufficient evidence exists to support a violation. If the board staff
determines that the evidence is:
1. Insufficient, then the board staff shall recommend dismissal and shall notify the certificate holder
and the complainant of the recommendation within seven (7) business days of the determination;
or
2. Sufficient, then the board staff shall have seven (7) business days to notify the certificate holder
and the complainant of the determination. Notice to the complainant shall only state that further
proceedings will occur;
(d) Upon a determination that sufficient evidence exists to support a possible violation, within the notice
required under paragraph (c)2. of this subsection, board staff shall initiate an in-person or virtual
conference with the certificate holder to share information and to determine if an agreed resolution can
be recommended to the board concerning the alleged violation. The conference shall be scheduled
within thirty (30) calendar days of the determination. The certificate holder may decline the conference.
If the conference does not occur due to the certificate holder's failure to respond within the thirty (30)
calendar days, the required conference shall be considered waived. The certificate holder may have an
attorney present at the conference;
(e) Upon the conclusion of the thirty (30) calendar days conference period, the board shall act on the
complaint within thirty (30) calendar days. If the board fails to act on the complaint within the thirty
(30) calendar days, then the complaint shall be considered dismissed. The board shall consider the
entirety of the complaint with any associated response or recommended agreed resolution to determine:
1. Dismissal, conditional dismissal upon completion of training, admonishment, further
investigation, or initiation of a hearing;
2. Approval of the recommended agreed resolution; or
3. A deferral if:
a. The content of the complaint is subject to ongoing:
i. Criminal investigation or proceedings;
ii. Child abuse, dependency, or neglect investigation by an authorized state agency; or
iii. Teacher tribunal process as provided in KRS 161.790; or
b. The deferral is agreed to by the certificate holder; and
(f) The provision of a confirmation of receipt from the board to the certificate holder whenever the
certificate holder submits a response or correspondence to the board.
(3) (a) The superintendent of each local school district shall report in writing to the Education Professional
Standards Board the name, address, phone number, Social Security number, and position name of any
certified school employee in the superintendent's[employee's] district:
1. Whose contract is terminated or not renewed, for cause except failure to meet local standards for
quality of teaching performance prior to the employee gaining tenure;
2. Who resigns from, or otherwise leaves, a position under threat of contract termination, or
nonrenewal, for cause;

CHAPTER 65 5
3. Who is convicted in a criminal prosecution; or
4. Who otherwise may have engaged in any actions or conduct while employed in the school
district that might reasonably be expected to warrant consideration for action against the
certificate under subsection (1) of this section.
The duty to report shall exist without regard to any disciplinary action, or lack thereof, by the
superintendent, and the required report shall be submitted within thirty (30) calendar days of the event
giving rise to the duty to report.
(b) The district superintendent shall inform the Education Professional Standards Board in writing of the
full facts and circumstances leading to the contract termination or nonrenewal, resignation, or other
absence, conviction, or otherwise reported actions or conduct of the certified employee, that may
warrant action against the certificate under subsection (1) of this section, and shall forward copies of all
relevant documents and records in his or her possession.
(c) The Education Professional Standards Board shall provide the superintendent confirmation of receipt of
any report submitted by the superintendent within seven (7) business days and shall provide the
superintendent with notice of:
1. Whether or not board staff determine that there is sufficient evidence in the report that a violation
may have occurred; and
2. Any board action taken against the certificate holder who is the subject of the report.
(d) The Education Professional Standards Board may consider reports and information received from other
sources.
(e) The certified school employee shall be given a copy of any report provided to the Education
Professional Standards Board by the district superintendent or other sources. The employee shall have
the right to file a written rebuttal pursuant to subsection (2) of this section to the report which shall be
placed in the official file with the report.
(4) A finding or action by a school superintendent or tribunal does not create a presumption of a violation or lack
of a violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(5) The board may issue a written admonishment to the certificate holder if the board determines, based on the
evidence, that a violation has occurred that is not of a serious nature. A copy of the written admonishment
shall be placed in the official file of the certificate holder. The certificate holder may respond in writing to the
admonishment within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt and have that response placed in his or her official
certification file. Alternatively, the certificate holder may file a request for a hearing with the board within
thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of the admonishment. Upon receipt of a request for a hearing, the board
shall set aside the written admonishment and set the matter for hearing pursuant to the provisions of KRS
Chapter 13B within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of the request.
(6) (a) In accordance with the timeline specified in this section, the Education Professional Standards Board
shall schedule and conduct a hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B:
1. Upon determining that a complaint warrants possible revoking, suspending, refusing to renew,
imposing probationary or supervisory conditions upon, issuing a written reprimand, or any
combination of these actions regarding any certificate;
2. After denying an application for a certificate, upon written request filed within thirty (30)
calendar days of receipt of the letter advising of the denial; or
3. After issuing a written admonishment, upon written request for a hearing filed within thirty (30)
calendar days of receipt of the written admonishment.
(b) If after the hearing required under paragraph (a) of this subsection is scheduled and the certificate
holder or applicant believes the hearing is not timely, the certificate holder or applicant may submit a
request for an expedited hearing, and the hearing shall be conducted within sixty (60) calendar days of
the request.
(c) Upon request, a hearing may be public or private at the discretion of the certified employee or applicant.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) The hearing shall be conducted before a hearing officer secured by the board pursuant to KRS 13B.030
and the board may:
1. Employ hearing officers;
2. Contract with another agency for hearing officers;
3. Contract with private attorneys through personal service contracts; or
4. Secure a hearing officer from the Attorney General's office.
(e) The hearing shall afford the certificate holder all the rights secured under KRS Chapter 13B.
(7) The Education Professional Standards Board or its chair may take emergency action pursuant to KRS
13B.125. Emergency action shall not affect a certificate holder's contract or tenure rights in the school district.
(8) If the Education Professional Standards Board substantiates that sexual contact occurred between a certified
employee and a student or minor, the employee's certificate may be revoked or suspended with mandatory
treatment of the employee as prescribed by the Education Professional Standards Board. The Education
Professional Standards Board may require the employee to pay a specified amount for mental health services
for the student or minor which are needed as a result of the sexual contact.
(9) At any time during the investigative or hearing processes, the board may enter into an agreed order or accept
an assurance of voluntary compliance with the certificate holder.
(10) The board may reconsider, modify, or reverse its decision on any disciplinary action.
(11) (a) Suspension of a certificate shall be for a specified period of time, not to exceed two (2) years.
(b)[(a)] At the conclusion of the specified period, upon demonstration of compliance with any
educational requirements and the terms set forth in the agreed order, the certificate shall be reactivated.
(c)[(b)] A suspended certificate is subject to expiration and termination.
(12) (a) Revocation of a certificate is a permanent forfeiture. The board shall establish the minimum period of
time before an applicant can apply for a new certificate.
(b)[(a)] At the conclusion of the specified period, and upon demonstration of compliance with any
educational requirements and the terms set forth in the agreed order, the applicant shall bear the burden
of proof to show that he or she is again fit for practice.
(c)[(b)] The board shall have discretion to impose conditions that it deems reasonably appropriate to
ensure the applicant's fitness and the protection of public safety. Any conditions imposed by the board
shall address or apply to only that time period after the revocation of the certificate.
(13) An appeal from any final order of the Education Professional Standards Board shall be filed in Franklin Circuit
Court or the Circuit Court of the county in which the certificate holder was employed when the incident
occurred in accordance with KRS 13B.140[Chapter 13B which provides that all final orders of an agency shall
be subject to judicial review].
Section 4. KRS 309.362 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may deny or refuse to renew a license, may suspend or revoke a license, may issue an
administrative reprimand, or may impose probationary conditions or fines not to exceed one thousand dollars
($1,000) per violation when the licensee has engaged in unprofessional conduct that has endangered or is
likely to endanger the health, welfare, or safety of the public. Unprofessional conduct shall include the
following:
(a) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license by fraud, misrepresentation, concealment of material facts,
or making a false statement to the board;
(b) Being convicted of a felony in any court if the act or acts for which the licensee or applicant for license
was convicted are determined by the board to have a direct bearing on whether the person is trustworthy
to serve the public as a licensed massage therapist, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B.
"Conviction," as used in this paragraph, includes[shall include] a finding or verdict of guilty, an
admission of guilt, or a plea of nolo contendere in a court of law;
(c) Violating any lawful order or administrative regulation promulgated by the board;

CHAPTER 65 7
(d) Violating any provision of this chapter or administrative regulations promulgated under this
chapter[thereunder];
(e) Having sexual contact as defined in[by] KRS 510.010[(7)] with a client or having engaged or attempted
to engage in lewd or immoral conduct with any client or patient;
(f) Engaging in fraud or material deception in the delivery of professional services, including
reimbursement or advertising services, in a false or misleading manner;
(g) Evidence of gross negligence or gross incompetence in the practice of massage therapy;
(h) Violating the standards of practice or the code of ethics as promulgated by administrative regulations;
(i) Violating KRS 304.39-215; or
(j) Engaging in conduct that is subject to the penalties under KRS 304.99-060(4) or (5).
(2) The board may, at its discretion, deny, refuse to renew, suspend or revoke a license, or impose probationary
conditions following an administrative hearing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B and in accordance with
administrative regulations promulgated by the board.
(3) The surrender of a license shall not deprive the board of jurisdiction to proceed with disciplinary actions under
KRS 309.350 to 309.364.
Section 5. KRS 311.595 is amended to read as follows:
If the power has not been transferred by statute to some other board, commission, or agency of the
Commonwealth[this state], the board may deny an application or reregistration for a license; place a licensee on
probation for a period not to exceed five (5) years; suspend a license for a period not to exceed five (5) years; limit or
restrict a license for an indefinite period; or revoke any license [heretofore or hereafter ]issued by the board, upon
proof that the licensee has:
(1) Knowingly made or presented, or caused to be made or presented, any false, fraudulent, or forged statement,
writing, certificate, diploma, or other thing, in connection with an application for a license or permit;
(2) Practiced, or aided or abetted in the practice of fraud, forgery, deception, collusion, or conspiracy in
connection with an examination for a license;
(3) Committed, procured, or aided in the procurement of an unlawful abortion, including a partial-birth abortion or
an abortion in violation of KRS 311.731;
(4) Entered a guilty or nolo contendere plea, or been convicted, by any court within or without the Commonwealth
of Kentucky of a crime as defined in KRS 335B.010, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B;
(5) Been convicted of a misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510 involving a patient, or a felony offense
under KRS Chapter 510 or KRS[,] 530.064(1)(a)[,] or 531.310, or been found by the board to have had sexual
contact as defined in KRS 510.010[(7)] with a patient while the patient was under the care of the physician;
(6) Become addicted to a controlled substance;
(7) Become a chronic or persistent alcoholic;
(8) Been unable or is unable to practice medicine according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by
reason of mental or physical illness or other condition including but not limited to physical deterioration that
adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills, or by reason of an extended absence from the active
practice of medicine;
(9) Engaged in dishonorable, unethical, or unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud, or
harm the public or any member of the public[thereof];
(10) Knowingly made, or caused to be made, or aided or abetted in the making of, a false statement in any
document executed in connection with the practice of his or her profession;
(11) Employed, as a practitioner of medicine or osteopathy in the practice of his or her profession in the
Commonwealth[this state], any person not duly licensed or otherwise aided, assisted, or abetted the unlawful
practice of medicine or osteopathy or any other healing art;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(12) Violated or attempted to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisted in or abetted the violation of, or conspired to
violate any provision or term of any medical practice act, including but not limited to the code of conduct
promulgated by the board under KRS 311.601 or any other valid regulation of the board;
(13) Violated any agreed order, letter of agreement, final order, or emergency order issued by the board;
(14) Engaged in or attempted to engage in the practice of medicine or osteopathy under a false or assumed name, or
impersonated another practitioner of a like, similar, or different name;
(15) Obtained a fee or other thing of value on the fraudulent representation that a manifestly incurable condition
could be cured;
(16) Willfully violated a confidential communication;
(17) Had his or her license to practice medicine or osteopathy in any other state, territory, or foreign nation
revoked, suspended, restricted, or limited or has been subjected to other disciplinary action by the licensing
authority thereof. This subsection shall not require relitigation of the disciplinary action;
(18) Failed or refused, without legal justification, to practice medicine in a rural area of the Commonwealth[this
state] in violation of a valid medical scholarship loan contract with the trustees of the rural Kentucky medical
scholarship fund;
(19) Given or received, directly or indirectly, from any person, firm, or corporation, any fee, commission, rebate, or
other form of compensation for sending, referring, or otherwise inducing a person to communicate with a
person licensed under KRS 311.530 to 311.620 in his or her professional capacity or for any professional
services not actually and personally rendered.[; provided,] However, [that nothing contained in ]this subsection
shall not prohibit persons holding valid and current licenses under KRS 311.530 to 311.620 from practicing
medicine in partnership or association or in a professional service corporation authorized by KRS Chapter 274,
as [now or hereinafter ]amended, or from pooling, sharing, dividing, or apportioning the fees and moneys
received by them or by the partnership, corporation, or association in accordance with the partnership
agreement or the policies of the board of directors of the corporation or association. [Nothing contained in
]This subsection shall not abrogate the right of two (2) or more persons holding valid and current licenses
under KRS 311.530 to 311.620 to receive adequate compensation for concurrently rendering professional care
to a single patient and divide a fee, if the patient has full knowledge of this division and if the division is made
in proportion to the services performed and responsibility assumed by each;
(20) Been removed, suspended, expelled, or disciplined by any professional medical association or society when
the action was based upon what the association or society found to be unprofessional conduct, professional
incompetence, malpractice, or a violation of any provision of KRS Chapter 311. This subsection shall not
require relitigation of the disciplinary action;
(21) Been disciplined by a licensed hospital or medical staff of the hospital, including removal, suspension,
limitation of hospital privileges, failing to renew privileges for cause, resignation of privileges under pressure
or investigation, or other disciplinary action if the action was based upon what the hospital or medical staff
found to be unprofessional conduct, professional incompetence, malpractice, or a violation of any provisions
of KRS Chapter 311. This subsection shall not require relitigation of the disciplinary action;
(22) Failed to comply with the requirements of KRS 213.101, 311.782, or 311.783 or failed to submit to the Vital
Statistics Branch in accordance with a court order a complete report as described in KRS 213.101;
(23) Failed to comply with any of the requirements regarding making or maintaining medical records or documents
described in KRS 311.7704 or 311.7707;
(24) Failed to comply with the requirements of KRS 311.7705 or 311.7706;
(25) Been convicted of female genital mutilation under KRS 508.125, which shall result in mandatory revocation of
a license;
(26) As provided in KRS 311.824(2), been convicted of a violation of KRS 311.823(2); or
(27) Failed to comply with the requirements of KRS 311.732.
Section 6. KRS 311A.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person shall not:
(a) Call or hold himself or herself out as or use the title of emergency medical technician, advanced
emergency medical technician, emergency medical responder, paramedic, advanced practice paramedic,

CHAPTER 65 9
emergency medical services educator, paramedic course coordinator, emergency medical services
medical director, mobile integrated healthcare program medical director, or any other member of
emergency medical services personnel unless licensed or certified under the provisions of this chapter.
The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply if the board does not license or certify a person as an
instructor in a particular discipline regulated by the board;
(b) Operate or offer to operate or represent or advertise the operation of a school or other educational
program for emergency medical services personnel unless the school or educational program has been
approved and licensed under the provisions of this chapter. The provisions of this paragraph shall not
apply to continuing education provided by a licensed ambulance service for anyone certified or licensed
by the board given by an ambulance service for its employees or volunteers; or
(c) Knowingly employ emergency medical services personnel unless that person is licensed or certified
under the provisions of this chapter.
(2) A[No] person who is licensed or certified by the board or[ who is] an applicant for licensure or certification by
the board shall not:
(a) If licensed or certified, violate any provision of this chapter or any administrative regulation
promulgated by the board;
(b) Use fraud or deceit in obtaining or attempting to obtain a license or certification from the board, or be
granted a license upon mistake of a material fact;
(c) If licensed or certified by the board, grossly negligently or willfully act in a manner inconsistent with
the practice of the discipline for which the person is certified or licensed;
(d) Be unfit or incompetent to practice a discipline regulated by the board by reason of negligence or other
causes;
(e) Abuse, misuse, or misappropriate any drugs placed in the custody of the licensee or certified person for
administration, or for use of others;
(f) Falsify or fail to make essential entries on essential records;
(g) Be convicted of a misdemeanor which involved acts that bear directly on the qualifications or ability of
the applicant, licensee, or certified person to practice the discipline for which the person is an applicant,
licensee, or certified person, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B;
(h) Be convicted of a misdemeanor which involved fraud, deceit, breach of trust, or physical harm or
endangerment to self or others, acts that bear directly on the qualifications or ability of the applicant,
licensee, or certificate holder to practice acts in the license or certification held or sought, if in
accordance with KRS Chapter 335B;
(i) Be convicted of a misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510 involving a patient or be found by the
board to have had sexual contact as defined in KRS 510.010[(7)] with a patient while the patient was
under the care of the licensee or certificate holder;
(j) Have had his or her license or credential to practice as a nurse or physician denied, limited, suspended,
probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined in Kentucky or in another jurisdiction on grounds sufficient
to cause a license to be denied, limited, suspended, probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined in this
Commonwealth;
(k) Have a license or certification to practice in any activity regulated by the board denied, limited,
suspended, probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined in another jurisdiction on grounds sufficient to
cause a license or certification to be denied, limited, suspended, probated, revoked, or otherwise
disciplined in this Commonwealth;
(l) Violate any lawful order or directive previously entered by the board;
(m) Have been listed on the nurse aide abuse registry with a substantiated finding of abuse, neglect, or
misappropriation of property; or
(n) Be convicted of, have entered a guilty plea to, or have entered an Alford plea to a felony offense, if in
accordance with KRS Chapter 335B.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) It shall be unlawful for an employer of a person licensed or certified by the board having knowledge of the
facts to refrain from reporting to the board on an official complaint form approved by the board through
administrative regulation any person licensed or certified by the board who:
(a) Has been convicted of, has entered a guilty plea to, or has entered an Alford plea to a felony offense;
(b) Has been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony which involved acts that bear directly on the
qualifications or ability of the applicant, licensee, or certified person to practice the discipline for which
they are an applicant, licensee, or certified person;
(c) Is reasonably suspected of fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to procure a license or certification
from the board;
(d) Is reasonably suspected of grossly negligently or willfully acting in a manner inconsistent with the
practice of the discipline for which they are certified or licensed;
(e) Is reasonably suspected of being unfit or incompetent to practice a discipline regulated by the board by
reason of negligence or other causes, including but not limited to being unable to practice the discipline
for which they are licensed or certified with reasonable skill or safety;
(f) Is reasonably suspected of violating any provisions of this chapter or the administrative regulations
promulgated under this chapter;
(g) Has a license or certification to practice an activity regulated by the board denied, limited, suspended,
probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined in another jurisdiction on grounds sufficient to cause a
license or certification to be denied, limited, suspended, probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined in
this Commonwealth;
(h) Is practicing an activity regulated by the board without a current active license or certification issued by
the board;
(i) Is reasonably suspected of abusing, misusing, or misappropriating any drugs placed in the custody of
the licensee or certified person for administration or for use of others; or
(j) Is suspected of falsifying or in a grossly negligent manner making incorrect entries or failing to make
essential entries on essential records.
(4) A person who violates subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for
the[a] first offense and a Class D felony for each subsequent offense.
(5) [The provisions of ]This section shall not preclude prosecution for the unlawful practice of medicine, nursing,
or other practice certified or licensed by an agency of the Commonwealth.
(6) The filing of criminal charges or a criminal conviction for violation of the provisions of this chapter or the
administrative regulations promulgated under this chapter[thereunder] shall not preclude the office of the
board from instituting or imposing board disciplinary action authorized by this chapter against any person or
organization violating this chapter or the administrative regulations promulgated under this
chapter[thereunder].
(7) The institution or imposition of disciplinary action by the office of the board against any person or
organization violating the provisions of this chapter or the administrative regulations promulgated under this
chapter[thereunder] shall not preclude the filing of criminal charges against or a criminal conviction of any
person or organization for violation of the provisions of this chapter or the administrative regulations
promulgated under this chapter[thereunder].
Section 7. KRS 314.091 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall have power to reprimand, deny, limit, revoke, probate, or suspend any license or credential to
practice nursing issued by the board or applied for in accordance with this chapter or the privilege to practice
as a nurse recognized by the board in accordance with this chapter, or to otherwise discipline a licensee,
credential holder, privilege holder, or applicant, or to deny admission to the licensure examination, or to
require evidence of evaluation and therapy upon proof that the person:
(a) Is guilty of fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to procure a license, credential, or privilege to
practice nursing;
(b) Has been convicted of any felony, or a misdemeanor involving drugs, alcohol, fraud, deceit,
falsification of records, a breach of trust, physical harm or endangerment to others, or dishonesty, under

CHAPTER 65 11
the laws of any state or of the United States, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B. The record of
conviction or a copy of the conviction[thereof], certified by the clerk of the court or by the judge who
presided over the conviction, shall be conclusive evidence;
(c) Has been convicted of a misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510 involving a patient, or a felony
offense under KRS Chapter 510 or KRS[,] 530.064(1)(a)[,] or 531.310, or has been found by the board
to have had sexual contact as defined in KRS 510.010[(7)] with a patient while the patient was under
the care of the nurse;
(d) Has negligently or willfully acted in a manner inconsistent with the practice of nursing;
(e) Is unfit or incompetent to practice nursing by reason of negligence or other causes, including but not
limited to, being unable to practice nursing with reasonable skill or safety;
(f) Abuses controlled substances, prescription medications, illegal substances, or alcohol;
(g) Has misused or misappropriated any drugs placed in the custody of the nurse for administration, or for
use of others;
(h) Has falsified or in a negligent manner made incorrect entries or failed to make essential entries on
essential records;
(i) Has a license, privilege, or credential to practice as a nurse denied, limited, suspended, probated,
revoked, or otherwise disciplined in another jurisdiction on grounds sufficient to cause a license or
privilege to be denied, limited, suspended, probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined in this
Commonwealth, including action by another jurisdiction for failure to repay a student loan;
(j) Has violated any of the provisions of this chapter;
(k) Has violated any lawful order or directive previously entered by the board;
(l) Has violated any administrative regulation promulgated by the board;
(m) Has been listed on either the adult caregiver misconduct registry or the nurse aide abuse registry with a
substantiated finding of abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property, or has a substantiated finding
or judicial finding of the abuse or neglect of a child;
(n) Has violated the confidentiality of information or knowledge concerning any patient, except as
authorized or required by law;
(o) Used or possessed a Schedule I controlled substance;
(p) Has used or been impaired as a consequence of the use of alcohol or drugs while practicing as a nurse;
(q) Has violated KRS 304.39-215;
(r) Has engaged in conduct that is subject to the penalties under KRS 304.99-060(4) or (5); or
(s) As provided in KRS 311.824(2), has been convicted of a violation of KRS 311.823(2).
(2) All hearings shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. A suspended or revoked license,
privilege, or credential may be reinstated at the discretion of the board, and in accordance with regulations
promulgated by the board.
(3) The executive director may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of
documents in the conduct of an investigation. The subpoenas may be enforced by the Circuit Court as for
contempt. Any order or subpoena of the court requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the
production of documentary evidence may be enforced and shall be valid anywhere in the Commonwealth[this
state].
(4) At all hearings on request of the board the Attorney General of the Commonwealth[this state] or one (1) of the
assistant attorneys general designated by the Attorney General shall appear and represent the board.
(5) A final order of the board shall be by majority vote thereof.
(6) Any person adversely affected by any final order of the board may obtain a review thereof by filing a written
petition for review with the Circuit Court of the county in which the board's offices are located in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13B.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(7) If the board substantiates that sexual contact occurred between a nurse and a patient while the patient was
under the care of or in a professional relationship with the nurse, the nurse's license, privilege, or credential
may be revoked or suspended with mandatory treatment of the nurse as prescribed by the board. The board
may require the nurse to pay a specified amount for mental health services for the patient which are needed as
a result of the sexual contact.
(8) The board may, by administrative regulation, provide for the recovery of the costs of an administrative
hearing.
Section 8. KRS 319C.070 is amended to read as follows:
The board may deny an application or reregistration for a license, place a licensee on probation for a period not to
exceed five (5) years, suspend a license for a period not to exceed five (5) years, limit or restrict a license for an
indefinite period, or revoke any license issued by the board, upon proof that the licensee has:
(1) Knowingly made or presented, or caused to be made or presented, any false, fraudulent, or forged statement,
writing, certificate, diploma, or other thing, in connection with an application for a license or permit;
(2) Practiced, or aided or abetted in the practice of, fraud, forgery, deception, collusion, or conspiracy in
connection with an examination for a license;
(3) Entered a guilty or nolo contendere plea, or been convicted, of a crime as defined in KRS 335B.010, if in
accordance with KRS Chapter 335B;
(4) Been convicted of a misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510 involving a patient, or a felony offense
under KRS Chapter 510[,] or KRS 530.064(1)(a) or 531.310, or been found by the board to have had sexual
contact as defined in KRS 510.010[(7)] with a patient while the patient was under the care of the licensee;
(5) Become addicted to a controlled substance;
(6) Become a chronic or persistent alcoholic;
(7) Been unable or is unable to practice applied behavior analysis according to acceptable and prevailing standards
of care by reason of mental or physical illness or other condition, including but not limited to physical
deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills, or by reason of an extended absence
from the active practice of applied behavior analysis;
(8) Engaged in dishonorable, unethical, or unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud, or
harm the public or any member of the public[thereof]; or
(9) Knowingly made, or caused to be made, or aided or abetted in the making of, a false statement in any
document executed in connection with the practice of his or her profession.
Section 9. KRS 319C.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board, after due notice and an opportunity for an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13B, may take any one (1) or a combination of the following actions against any applied
behavior analyst or applied assistant behavior analyst licensee or applicant:
(a) Refuse to license or certify any applicant;
(b) Refuse to renew the license or certificate of any person;
(c) Suspend or revoke or place on probation the license or certificate of any person;
(d) Impose restrictions on the scope of practice of any person;
(e) Issue an administrative reprimand to any person;
(f) Issue a private admonishment to any person; and
(g) Impose fines for violations of this chapter, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(2) The following acts by a licensee may be considered cause for disciplinary action:
(a) Indulgence in excessive use of alcoholic beverages or abusive use of controlled substances that impairs
the licensee's ability to practice applied behavior analysis;
(b) Engaging in, permitting, or attempting to engage in or permit the performance of substandard patient
care by himself or herself or by persons working under his or her supervision due to a deliberate or
negligent act or failure to act, regardless of whether actual injury to the patient is established;

CHAPTER 65 13
(c) Having engaged in or attempted to engage in a course of lewd or immoral conduct with any person
while that person is a patient or client of the behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst;
(d) Having sexual contact, as defined in[by] KRS 510.010[(7)], without the consent of both parties, with an
employee or coworker of the licensee;
(e) Sexually harassing an employee or coworker of the licensee;
(f) Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor in the courts of the Commonwealth[this state] or any other
state, territory, or country which affects his or her ability to continue to practice competently and safely
on the public. ["Conviction," ]As used in this paragraph, "conviction" includes[shall include] a finding
or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilt, or a plea of nolo contendere;
(g) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license by fraud or material misrepresentation or making any other
false statement to the board;
(h) Engaging in fraud or material deception in the delivery of professional services, including
reimbursement, or in advertising services in a false or misleading manner;
(i) Evidence of gross negligence or gross incompetence in his or her practice of behavior analysis;
(j) Documentation of being declared mentally disabled by a court of competent jurisdiction and not
thereafter having had his or her rights restored;
(k) Failing or refusing to obey any lawful order or administrative regulation of the board;
(l) Promoting for personal gain an unnecessary device, treatment, procedure, or service, or directing or
requiring a patient to purchase a device, treatment, procedure, or service from a facility or business in
which he or she has a financial interest; and
(m) Being impaired by reason of a mental, physical, or other condition that impedes his or her ability to
practice competently.
(3) A private admonishment shall not be subject to disclosure to the public under KRS 61.878(1)(l). A private
admonishment shall not constitute disciplinary action but may be used by the board for statistical purposes or
in subsequent disciplinary action against the same licensee or applicant.
Section 10. KRS 327.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board, after due notice and an opportunity for an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13B may take any one (1) or a combination of the following actions against any licensee,
certificate holder, or applicant:
(a) Refuse to license or certify any applicant;
(b) Refuse to renew the license or certificate of any person;
(c) Suspend or revoke or place on probation the license or certificate of any person;
(d) Impose restrictions on the scope of practice of any person;
(e) Issue an administrative reprimand to any person;
(f) Issue a private admonishment to any person; and
(g) Impose fines for violations of this chapter not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(2) The following acts by a licensee, certificate holder, or applicant may be considered cause for disciplinary
action:
(a) Indulgence in excessive use of alcoholic beverages or abusive use of controlled substances;
(b) Engaging in, permitting, or attempting to engage in or permit the performance of substandard patient
care by himself or herself or by persons working under his or her supervision due to a deliberate or
negligent act or failure to act, regardless of whether actual injury to the patient is established;
(c) Having engaged in or attempted to engage in a course of lewd or immoral conduct with any person:
1. While that person is a patient of a health care facility as defined in[by] KRS 216B.015, where
the physical therapist or physical therapist's assistant provides physical therapy services; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. While that person is a patient or client of the physical therapist or physical therapist's assistant;
(d) Having sexual contact, as defined in[by] KRS 510.010[(7)], without the consent of both parties, with an
employee or coworker of the licensee or certificate holder;
(e) Sexually harassing an employee or coworker of the licensee or certificate holder;
(f) Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor in the courts of the Commonwealth[this state] or any other
state, territory, or country which affects his or her ability to continue to practice competently and safely
on the public, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B. ["Conviction," ]As used in this paragraph,
"conviction" includes[shall include] a finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilt, or a plea of
nolo contendere;
(g) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license or certificate by fraud or material misrepresentation or
making any other false statement to the board;
(h) Engaging in fraud or material deception in the delivery of professional services, including
reimbursement, or advertising services in a false or misleading manner;
(i) Evidence of gross negligence or gross incompetence in his or her practice of physical therapy;
(j) Documentation of being declared mentally disabled by a court of competent jurisdiction without[and
not thereafter] having had his or her rights restored;
(k) Failing or refusing to obey any lawful order or administrative regulation of the board;
(l) Promoting for personal gain an unnecessary device, treatment, procedure, or service, or directing or
requiring a patient to purchase a device, treatment, procedure, or service from a facility or business in
which he or she has a financial interest;
(m) Being impaired by reason of a mental, physical, or other condition that impedes his or her ability to
practice competently;
(n) Violation of KRS 304.39-215; and
(o) Conduct that is subject to the penalties under KRS 304.99-060(4) or (5).
(3) A private admonishment shall not be subject to disclosure to the public under KRS 61.878(1)(l). A private
admonishment shall not constitute disciplinary action but may be used by the board for statistical purposes or
in subsequent disciplinary action against the same licensee, certificate holder, or applicant.
Section 11. KRS 335.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue or renew; impose probationary or supervisory conditions
upon; impose an administrative fine; issue a written reprimand or admonishment; or any combination of
actions regarding any applicant, license, or licensee upon proof that the applicant or licensee has:
(a) Committed any act of dishonesty or corruption, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B. If the act
constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a condition precedent to disciplinary
action. Upon conviction of the crime, the judgment and sentence creates a rebuttable presumption at the
ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the applicant or licensee. Conviction includes all instances in
which a plea of no contest is the basis of the conviction;
(b) Misrepresented or concealed a material fact in obtaining a license, or in reinstatement thereof;
(c) Committed any unfair, false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice;
(d) Been incompetent or negligent in the practice of social work;
(e) Violated any state statute or administrative regulation governing the practice of social work or any
activities undertaken by a social worker;
(f) Failed to comply with an order issued by the board or an assurance of voluntary compliance;
(g) Violated the code of ethical conduct as set forth by the board by promulgation of an administrative
regulation;
(h) Been legally declared mentally incompetent;
(i) Aided or abetted another person in falsely procuring or attempting to procure a license; or

CHAPTER 65 15
(j) Aided or abetted an unlicensed person in the practice of social work.
(2) Five (5) years from the date of a revocation, any person whose license has been revoked may petition the
board for reinstatement. The board shall investigate the petition and may reinstate the license upon a finding
that the individual has complied with any terms prescribed by the board and is again able to engage
competently in the practice of social work.
(3) If an alleged violation is not of a serious nature and the evidence presented to the board, after the investigation
and appropriate opportunity for the licensee to respond, provides a clear indication that the alleged violation
did in fact occur, the board may issue a written admonishment to the licensee. A copy of the admonishment
shall be placed in the permanent file of the licensee. The licensee shall have the right to file a response within
thirty (30) days of its receipt and to have the response placed in the licensee's permanent file. Alternatively, the
licensee may file a request for a hearing, within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the written admonishment.
Upon receipt of this request, the board shall set aside the written admonishment and set the matter for hearing.
(4) At any time during the investigative or hearing processes, the board may enter into an agreed order with, or
accept an assurance of voluntary compliance from, the licensee that effectively satisfies the complaint.
(5) The board may reconsider, modify, or reverse its decision regarding probation, suspension, or any other
disciplinary action.
(6) Upon proof substantiating that sexual contact occurred between a social worker licensed by the board and a
client while the client was under the care of or in a professional relationship with the social worker, the social
worker's license may be revoked or suspended with mandatory treatment of the social worker as prescribed by
the board. The board may require the social worker to pay a specified amount for mental health services for the
client which are needed as a result of the sexual contact.
(7) The board may revoke the license of a social worker if the social worker has been convicted of a misdemeanor
offense under KRS Chapter 510 involving a client or a felony offense under KRS Chapter 510 or KRS[,]
530.064(1)(a)[,] or 531.310, or has been found to have had sexual contact as defined in KRS 510.010[(7)] with
a client while the client was under the care of the social worker.
Signed by Governor April 10, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version